District of Columbia statutes.
38-1805.61

Waivers.

(a)

In general. —

(1)

Requirements waived. —

Subject to subsection (b) of this section, all District of Columbia fees and all requirements contained in the document entitled “District of Columbia Public Schools Standard Contract Provisions” (as such document was in effect on November 2, 1995 and including any revisions or modifications to such document) published by the District of Columbia public schools for use with construction or maintenance projects, are waived, for purposes of repair and improvement of District of Columbia public schools facilities for a period beginning on April 26, 1996, and ending 24 months after such date.

(2)

Donations. —

Any individual may volunteer his or her services or may donate materials to a District of Columbia public school facility for the repair and improvement of such facility provided that the provision of voluntary services meets the requirements of 29 U.S.C. 203(e)(4).

(b)

Limitation. —

A waiver under subsection (a) of this section shall not apply to the Davis-Bacon Act (40 U.S.C. 276a et seq.) [revised, now see 40 U.S.C. 3142] or Executive Order 11246 or other civil rights standards.

Apr. 26, 1996, 110 Stat. 1321 [263], Pub. L. 104-134, § 2561
Sept. 9, 1996, 110 Stat. 2356 2377, Pub. L. 104-194, § 148
Sept. 30, 1996, 110 Stat. 3009 1473, Pub. L. 104-208, § 5205(h)
1981 Ed., § 31-2853.53.